Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.140

Park commissioners—Civil service for employees.

A metropolitan park district may establish civil service for its employees by resolution upon the following plan:

(1) It shall create a civil service commission with authority to appoint a personnel officer and to make rules and regulations for classification based upon suitable differences in pay for differences in work, and for like pay for like work, and for competitive entrance and promotional examinations; for certifications, appointments, probationary service periods and for dismissals therein; for demotions and promotions based upon merit and for reemployments, suspensions, transfers, sick leaves and vacations; for lay-offs when necessary according to seniority; for separations from the service by discharge for cause; for hearings and reinstatements, for establishing status for incumbent employees, and for prescribing penalties for violations.

(2) The civil service commission and personnel officer shall adopt rules to be known as civil service rules to govern the administration of personnel transactions and procedure. The rules so adopted shall have the force and effect of law, and, in any and all proceedings, the rules shall be liberally interpreted and construed to the end that the purposes and basic requirements of the civil service system may be given the fullest force and effect.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.61.140. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-4, part; prior: 1919 c 135 s 1, part; 1907 c 98 s 4; RRS s 6723, part.]

NOTES:

Public employment, civil service and pensions: Title 41 RCW.